Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1549.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 28-8601, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE28-8601. Definitions In this article, unless the context otherwise requires: 1. "Advanced air mobility" means an air transportation system that primarily uses an electric aircraft, including an eCTOL, eVTOL, ultralight vehicle and powered lift aircraft, to carry passengers or cargo in an urban or a regional area. 2. "eCTOL" means an electric conventional takeoff and landing aircraft. 3. "eVTOL" means an electric vertical takeoff and landing aircraft. 4. "Powered lift aircraft" means a heavier-than-air aircraft that is capable of vertical takeoff, vertical landing and low-speed flight and that primarily uses engine-driven lift devices or engine thrust for lifting the aircraft during a takeoff and at least one nonrotating airfoil for lifting the aircraft during horizontal flight. 5. "Ultralight vehicle" means a vehicle that meets all of the following requirements: (a) Is used or intended to be used for manned operation in the air by a single occupant. (b) Does not have a United States or foreign airworthiness certificate. (c) If unpowered, weighs less than one hundred fifty-five pounds. (d) If powered: (i) Weighs less than two hundred fifty-four pounds empty weight, excluding floats and safety devices that are intended for deployment in a potentially catastrophic situation. (ii) Has a fuel capacity of not more than five gallons. (iii) Does not exceed more than fifty-five knots calibrated airspeed at full power in level flight. (iv) Has a power-off stall speed of not more than twenty-four knots calibrated airspeed. 5. 6. "Vertiport" means an area of land or water or a structure that is primarily used for the takeoff or landing of a powered lift aircraft, including associated buildings or facilities. END_STATUTE